California statutes. Public Resources Code
 limits established by the California Tax Credit Allocation Committee.

(4) “Eligible public agency” means any of the following:

(A) The County of Los Angeles.

(B) The Los Angeles Unified School District.

(C) The Los Angeles County Metropolitan Transportation Authority.

(D) The Housing Authority of the City of Los Angeles.

(E) The Los Angeles Homeless Services Authority.

(F) The Los Angeles Community College District.

(G) The successor agency for the former Community Redevelopment Agency of the City of Los Angeles.

(H) The Department of Transportation.

(I) The Department of Parks and Recreation.

(J) The Los Angeles County Development Authority.

(5) “Housing development project” has the same meaning as defined in subdivision (h) of Section 65589.5 of the Government Code.

(6) “Low barrier navigation center” means a low barrier navigation center, as defined in subdivision (a) of Section 65660 of the Government Code, that is funded in whole or in part by any of the following:

(A) The Homeless Housing, Assistance, and Prevention program established pursuant to Section 50217 of the Health and Safety Code.

(B) Measure H sales tax proceeds approved by the voters at the March 7, 2017, special election in the County of Los Angeles.

(C) General obligation bonds issued pursuant to Proposition
 HHH, approved by the voters of the City of Los Angeles at the November 8, 2016, statewide general election.

(D) The program referred to as Homekey, as described in Section 50675.1.1 of the Health and Safety Code.

(E) The Encampment Resolution Funding program established pursuant to Section 50251 of the Health and Safety Code.

(F) The Building Homes and Jobs Trust Fund established pursuant to Section 50470 of the Health and Safety Code.

(G) The Behavioral Health Bridge Housing Program established pursuant to Item 4260-101-0001 of Section 2.00 of the Budget Act of 2022.

(H) The
 Behavioral Health Continuum Infrastructure Program established pursuant to Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 5960)
 of Part 7 of Division 5 of the Welfare and Institutions Code.

(7) “Project labor agreement” has the same meaning as set forth in paragraph (1) of subdivision (b) of Section 2500 of the Public Contract Code.

(8) “Supportive housing” means supportive housing, as defined in Section 50675.14 of the Health and Safety Code, that meets the eligibility requirements of Article 11 (commencing with Section 65650) of Chapter 3 of Division 1 of Title 7 of the
 Government Code or the eligibility requirements for qualified supportive housing or qualified permanent supportive housing set forth in
 City of Los Angeles Ordinance No. 185,489 or 185,492, and that is funded, in whole or in part, by any of the following:

(A) The No Place Like Home Program (Part 3.9 (commencing with Section 5849.1) of Division 5 of the Welfare and Institutions Code).

(B) The Building Homes and Jobs Trust Fund established pursuant to Section 50470 of the Health and Safety Code.

(C) Measure H sales tax proceeds approved by the voters at the March 7, 2017, special election in the County of Los Angeles.

(D) General obligation bonds issued pursuant to Proposition HHH, approved by the voters of the City of Los Angeles at the November 8, 2016, statewide general
 election.

(E) The City of Los Angeles Housing Impact Trust Fund.

(F) The program referred to as Homekey, as described in Section 50675.1.1 of the Health and Safety Code.

(G) The Veterans Housing and Homeless Prevention Act of 2014 established pursuant to Article 3.2 (commencing with Section 987.001) of Chapter 6 of Division 4 of the Military and Veterans Code.

(H) The Multifamily Housing Program established pursuant to Chapter 6.7 (commencing with Section 50675) of Part 2 of Division 31 of the Health and Safety Code.

(I) The Infill Infrastructure Grant Program of 2019 established pursuant to Part 12.5
 (commencing with Section 53559) of Division 31 of the Health and Safety Code.

(J) The California Housing Accelerator program established pursuant to Chapter 6.6 (commencing with Section 50672) of Part 2 of Division 31 of the Health and Safety Code.

(K) The Affordable Housing and Sustainable Communities Program established pursuant to Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 75210) of Part 1 of Division 44.

(L) The City of Los Angeles House LA Fund approved by the voters of the City of Los Angeles at the November 8, 2022, statewide general election.

(M) Funding distributed by the Los Angeles County Affordable Housing Solutions Agency established pursuant to Title
 6.9 (commencing with Section 64700) of the Government Code.

(N) Funding distributed by the California Debt Limit Allocation Committee and the California Tax Credit Allocation Committee.

(9) “Transitional housing projects for youth and young adults” means buildings configured as rental housing
 developments for youth and young adults, but operated under program requirements that require the termination of assistance and recirculating of the assisted unit to another eligible program recipient at a predetermined future point in time that shall be no less than six months from the beginning of the assistance, or as defined in Section 65582 of the Government Code, and that is funded, in whole or in part, by any of the following:

(A) The Homeless Housing, Assistance, and Prevention program established pursuant to Section 50217 of the Health and Safety Code.

(B) Measure H sales tax proceeds approved by the voters at the March 7, 2017, special election in the County of Los Angeles.

(C) General
 obligation bonds issued pursuant to Proposition HHH approved by the voters of the City of Los Angeles at the November 8, 2016, statewide general election.

(D) The program referred to as Homekey, as described in Section 50675.1.1 of the Health and Safety Code.

(E) The Encampment Resolution Funding program established pursuant to Section 50251 of the Health and Safety Code.

(10) “Youth and young adults” means persons between 12 and 24 years of age, inclusive. “Youth and young
 adults” includes persons who are pregnant and parenting.

(b) Subject to subdivision (e), this division does not apply to any of the following activities undertaken by the City of Los Angeles within the City of Los Angeles:

(1) The issuance of an entitlement for, or the approval of the construction of, an affordable housing project, a low barrier navigation center, a supportive housing project, or a
 transitional housing project for youth and young adults.

(2) An action to lease, convey, or encumber land for an affordable housing project, a low barrier navigation center, a supportive housing project, or a transitional housing project for youth and young adults.

(3) An action to facilitate the lease, conveyance, or encumbrance of land owned or to be purchased for an affordable housing project, a low barrier navigation center, a supportive housing project, or a transitional housing project for youth and young adults.

(4) Rezoning, specific plan amendments, or general plan amendments required specifically and exclusively to allow the construction of an affordable housing project, a low barrier navigation
 center, a supportive housing project, or a transitional housing project for youth and young adults.

(5) An action to provide financial assistance in furtherance of implementing an affordable housing project, a low barrier navigation center, a supportive housing project, or a transitional housing project for youth and young adults.

(c) Subject to subdivision (e), this division does not apply to any of the following activities undertaken by the County of Los Angeles within the unincorporated areas of the County of Los Angeles or parcels owned by the County of Los Angeles
 within the City of Los Angeles: 

(1) The issuance of an entitlement for, or the approval of the construction of, an affordable housing project, a low barrier navigation center, a supportive housing project, or a transitional housing project for youth and young adults.

(2) An action to lease, convey, or encumber land for an affordable housing project, a low barrier navigation center, a supportive housing project, or a transitional housing project for youth and young adults.

(3) An action to facilitate the lease, conveyance, or encumbrance of
 land owned or to be purchased for an affordable housing project,
 a low barrier navigation center, a supportive housing project, or a transitional housing project for youth and young adults.

(4) Rezoning, specific plan amendments, or general plan amendments required specifically and exclusively to allow the construction of an affordable housing project, a low barrier navigation center, a supportive housing project, or a transitional housing project for youth and young adults.

(5) An action to provide financial assistance in furtherance of implementing an affordable housing project, a low barrier navigation center, a supportive housing project, or a transitional housing project for youth and young adults.

(d) Subject
 to subdivision (e), this division does not apply to any of the following activities undertaken by an eligible public agency in the City of Los Angeles or within the unincorporated areas of the County of Los Angeles: 

(1) An action to lease, convey, or encumber land for an affordable housing project, a low barrier navigation center, a supportive housing project, or a transitional housing project for youth and young adults.

(2) An action to facilitate the lease, conveyance, or encumbrance of land owned or to be purchased for an affordable housing project,
 a low barrier navigation center, a supportive housing project, or a transitional housing project for youth and young adults.

(3) An action to provide financial assistance in furtherance of implementing an affordable housing project, a low barrier navigation center, a supportive housing project, or a transitional housing project for youth and young adults.

(e) (1) (A) For an affordable housing project, low barrier navigation center, supportive housing project, or transition housing project for youth and young adults, that is not in its entirety a public work for purposes of Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 1720) of Part 7 of Division 2 of the Labor Code, this section applies only if the
 project sponsor certifies to the lead agency that all of the following will be met for any construction or rehabilitation work:

(i) All construction and rehabilitation workers employed in the execution of the project will be paid at least the general prevailing rate of per diem wages for the type of work and geographic area, as determined by the Director of Industrial Relations pursuant to Sections 1773 and 1773.9 of the Labor Code, except that apprentices registered in programs approved by the Chief of the Division of Apprenticeship Standards may be paid at least the applicable apprentice prevailing rate.

(ii) The project sponsor ensures that the prevailing wage requirement is included in all contracts for the performance of the work for those portions of the project that are not a public work.

(iii) All contractors
 and subcontractors for those portions of the project that are not a public work comply with both of the following:

(I) Pay to all construction and rehabilitation workers employed in the execution of the work at least the general prevailing rate of per diem wages, except that apprentices registered in programs approved by the Chief of the Division of Apprenticeship Standards may be paid at least the applicable apprentice prevailing rate.

(II) Maintain and verify payroll records pursuant to Section 1776 of the Labor Code and make those records available for inspection and copying as provided in that section. This subclause does not apply if all contractors and subcontractors performing work on the project are subject to a project labor agreement that requires the payment of prevailing wages to all construction workers employed in the execution of the project and provides for
 enforcement of that obligation through an arbitration procedure.

(B) (i) The obligation of the contractors and subcontractors to pay prevailing wages pursuant to subparagraph (A) may be enforced by any of the following:

(I) The Labor Commissioner through the issuance of a civil wage and penalty assessment pursuant to Section 1741 of the Labor Code, which may be reviewed pursuant to Section 1742 of the Labor Code, within 18 months after the completion of the project.

(II) An underpaid worker through an administrative complaint or civil action.

(III) A joint labor-management committee through a civil action under Section 1771.2 of the Labor Code.

(ii) If a civil wage
 and penalty assessment is issued pursuant to this subparagraph, the contractor, subcontractor, and surety on a bond or bonds issued to secure the payment of wages covered by the assessment shall be liable for liquidated damages pursuant to Section 1742.1 of the Labor Code.

(iii) This subparagraph does not apply if all contractors and subcontractors performing work on the project are subject to a project labor agreement that requires the payment of prevailing wages to all construction workers employed in the execution of the project and provides for enforcement of that obligation through an arbitration procedure.

(C) Notwithstanding subdivision (c) of Section 1773.1 of the Labor Code, the requirement that employer payments not reduce the obligation to pay the hourly straight time or overtime wages found to be prevailing does not apply to those portions of the project that are not a
 public work if otherwise provided in a bona fide collective bargaining agreement covering the worker.

(D) The requirement of subparagraph (A) to pay at least the general prevailing rate of per diem wages does not preclude use of an alternative workweek schedule adopted pursuant to Section 511 or 514 of the Labor Code.

(2) In addition to paragraph (1), for an affordable housing project, supportive housing project, or transitional housing project for youth and young adults involving the construction or rehabilitation work of 40 or more housing units, this section applies only if the project sponsor certifies to the lead agency that the work will be subject to a project labor agreement.

(f) If a lead agency determines that an activity is not subject to this division pursuant to subdivision (b), (c), or (d), and determines to approve or carry out the activity, the lead agency shall file a notice of exemption with the Office of Planning and Research and the county clerk in the manner specified in subdivisions (b) and (c) of Section 21108 or subdivisions (b) and (c) of Section 21152.

(g) This section shall remain in effect
 only until January 1, 2030, and as of that date is repealed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 726, Sec. 2.   (AB 785)   Effective January 1, 2024.   Repealed as of January 1, 2030, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

21080.27.5.

(a) This division does not apply to any of the following activities by a local agency:

(1) An action to lease or facilitate the lease of land owned by the local agency for a low barrier navigation center.

(2) An action associated with a lease for a low barrier navigation center pursuant to subdivision (a).

(3) An action to provide financial assistance to a low barrier navigation center.

(4) An action to construct or operate a low barrier navigation center.

(5) An action to enter into a
 contract to provide services to a low barrier navigation center.

(b) For purposes of this section, “low barrier navigation center” has the same definition as in Section 65660 of the Government Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 297, Sec. 4.   (SB 1395)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

21080.28.

(a) This division does not apply to either of the following:

(1) The acquisition, sale, or other transfer of interest in land by a public agency for any of the following purposes:

(A) Preservation of natural conditions existing at the time of transfer, including plant and animal habitats.

(B) Restoration of natural conditions, including
 plant and animal habitats.

(C) Continuing agricultural use of the land.

(D) Prevention of encroachment of development into flood plains.

(E) Preservation of historical resources.

(F) Preservation of open space or lands for park purposes.

(2) The granting or acceptance of funding by a public agency for purposes of paragraph (1).

(b) Subdivision (a) applies even if physical changes to the environment or changes in the use of the land are a reasonably foreseeable consequence of the acquisition, sale, or other transfer of the interests in land, or of the granting or acceptance of funding, provided that environmental review otherwise required by this division occurs before any project approval that would authorize physical changes being made to that land.

(c) If the lead agency determines that an activity is not subject to this division pursuant to this section and the lead agency determines to approve or carry out the activity, the
 lead agency shall file a notice with the Office of Planning and Research and with the county clerk in the county in which the land is located in the manner specified in subdivisions (b) and (c) of Section 21152.

(History: Added by Stats. 2019, Ch. 181, Sec. 2.   (AB 782)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

21080.28.5.

(a) It is the intent of the Legislature in enacting this section to clarify the applicability of this division to the provision of public access within a park or open space area by a county park agency, a park district, or the Great Redwood Trail Agency in a manner that involves minimal physical alterations and minimal improvements to the affected area. This section is not intended to
 provide relief from any other law, regulation, or responsibility.

(b) (1) Subject to paragraph (2), this division does not apply to a change in use approved by a lead agency to allow public access to any of the following in an area used exclusively for nonmotorized recreation:

(A) Preexisting paved and natural surface roads.

(B) Preexisting trails.

(C) Preexisting pathways.

(D) Preexisting disturbed areas for vehicle parking, such as driveways, when the change of use does not involve new paving or grading.

(E) Rail lines converted by the Great Redwood Trail Agency into trails known as the Great Redwood Trail.

(2) The exemption in paragraph (1) only applies if all of the following criteria are met:

(A) The lead agency is a county park agency, a park district, or the Great Redwood Trail Agency.

(B) The area used for nonmotorized recreation is owned or managed by a county park agency, a park district, or the Great Redwood Trail Agency.

(C) The change in use is to provide public access for nonmotorized recreation.

(D) The change in use only involves minimal physical alterations and minimal improvements to the affected area. Minimal improvements shall only include signage, portable restrooms, sediment control, and other similar improvements that protect the environment in the context of public access.

(E) The change in use is not likely to result in either of the following:

(i) Significant adverse impacts to tribal cultural resources.

(ii) Significant adverse impacts to endangered, threatened, rare, or special status plant or animal species.

(c) Before making a determination to approve or carry out a change in use that is determined to be exempt from this division pursuant to subdivision (b), the lead agency shall do all of the following:

(1) Hold a public meeting to consider and solicit public input on the change in use under consideration.

(2) Post a written notice of the public meeting on the public agency’s internet website and at the project site at least 30 days before the public meeting. The written notice shall include a project description and the location and date of the public meeting.

(3) (A) Adopt a natural resource management plan, or equivalent document, that includes appropriate identification of resources and management strategies for the affected area, which may include, but is not limited to, all of the following:

(i) The identification of sensitive species of flora and fauna, sensitive habitats, sensitive soils and erosion considerations, sensitive coastal resources, hydrology, and fire ignition
 hazards.

(ii) The identification of tribal, historical, and other cultural resources.

(iii) The identification of avoidance strategies and mitigation measures for any impact to the resources described in clauses (i) and (ii).

(iv) The identification of ongoing maintenance and management needs.

(B) The adoption of a natural resource management plan, or equivalent document, for purposes of making an exemption determination pursuant to this section is not subject to this division.

(4) Make a finding
 based on substantial evidence that all of the criteria specified in paragraph (2) of subdivision (b) are met and that there is sufficient funding to implement the natural resource management plan or equivalent document.

(d) If the lead agency determines that a change in use is not subject to this division pursuant to this section, and the lead agency determines to approve or carry out the activity, the lead agency shall file a notice with the State Clearinghouse in the
 Office of Land Use and Climate Innovation and with the county clerk of the county in which the land is located in accordance with subdivisions (b), (c), and (d) of Section 21152.

(e) For purposes of this section, the following definitions apply:

(1) “Nonmotorized recreation” means low-impact recreational activities, including hiking, walking, bike riding, equestrian use, and nature viewing.

(2) “Park district” means a district, as defined in Section 5500, that is governed by an independent board.

(3) “Public access” means allowing visitors on public agency-managed park and open space in a manner that is consistent with the underlying conservation or
 park purposes for those lands.

(f) This section does not apply where it is reasonably foreseeable that the provision of public access within a park or open-space area will have a significant or cumulatively considerable effect on the environment.

(g) This section does not affect any land covenants, such as grant agreements, conservation easements, or deed restrictions, or a long-term management plan or habitat conservation plan, or alters any conditions of
 acquisition.

(h) This section shall remain in effect only until January 1, 2030, and as of that date is repealed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 391, Sec. 1.   (AB 1139)   Effective January 1, 2026.   Repealed as of January 1, 2030, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

21080.29.

(a) A project located in Los Angeles County that is approved by a public agency before the effective date of the act adding this section is not in violation of any requirement of this division by reason of the failure to construct a roadway across the property transferred to the state pursuant to subdivision (c) and to construct a bridge over the adjacent Ballona Channel in Los Angeles County, otherwise required as a mitigation measure pursuant to this division, if all of the following conditions apply:

(1) The improvements specified in this subdivision are not constructed, due in whole or in part, to the project owner’s or developer’s relinquishment of easement rights to construct those improvements.

(2) The easement rights in paragraph (1) are relinquished in connection with the State of California, acting by and through the Wildlife Conservation Board of the Department of Fish and Game, acquiring a wetlands project that is a minimum of 400 acres in size and located within the coastal zone.

(b) Where those easement rights have been relinquished, any municipal ordinance or regulation adopted by a charter city or a general law city shall be inapplicable to the extent that the ordinance or regulation requires construction of the transportation improvements specified in subdivision (a), or would otherwise require reprocessing or resubmittal of a permit or approval, including, but not limited to, a final recorded map, a vesting tentative map, or a tentative map, as a result of the transportation improvements specified in subdivision (a) not being constructed.

(c) (1) If the Wildlife Conservation Board of the Department of Fish and Game acquires property within the coastal zone that is a minimum of 400 acres in size pursuant to a purchase and sale agreement with Playa Capital Company, LLC, the Controller shall direct the trustee under the Amendment to Declaration of Trust entered into on or about December 11, 1984, by First Nationwide Savings, as trustee, Summa Corporation, as trustor, and the Controller, as beneficiary, known as the HRH Inheritance Tax Security Trust, to convey title to the trust estate of the trust, including real property commonly known as Playa Vista Area C, to the State of California acting by and through the Wildlife Conservation Board of the Department of Fish and Game for conservation, restoration, or recreation purposes only, with the right to transfer the property for those uses to any other agency of the State of California.

(2) This subdivision shall constitute the enabling legislation required by the Amendment to Declaration of Trust to empower the Controller to direct the trustee to convey title to the trust estate under the HRH Inheritance Tax Security Trust to the State of California or an agency thereof.

(3) The conveyance of the trust estate to the Wildlife Conservation Board pursuant to this subdivision shall supersede any duty or obligation imposed upon the Controller under the Probate Code or the Revenue and Taxation Code with respect to the disposition or application of the net proceeds of the trust estate.

(History: Added by Stats. 2003, Ch. 739, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

21080.30.

(a) For purposes of this section, “real estate transaction” means the acquisition or disposition of any interest in real property.

(b) This division does not apply to any action, approval, or authorization provided by the State Public Works Board or the Department of Finance regarding any bond issuance, capital outlay project, or real estate transaction.

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 21, Sec. 11.   (AB 119)   Effective June 27, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

21080.31.

(a) For purposes of this section, the following terms have the following definitions:

(1) “Adequate supply” has the same meaning as set forth in subdivision (a) of Section 116681 of the Health and Safety Code. 

(2) “Domestic well” has the same meaning as set forth in subdivision (i) of Section 116681 of the Health and Safety Code.

(3) “Safe drinking water” has the same meaning as set forth in subdivision (o) of Section 116681 of the Health and Safety Code.

(4) “State board” means the
 State Water Resources Control Board. 

(5) “Water system” means all of the following:

(A) A public water system, as defined in subdivision (h) of Section 116275 of the Health and Safety Code.

(B) A state small water system, as defined in subdivision (n) of Section 116275 of the Health and Safety Code.

(C) A tribal water system. For purposes of this subparagraph, “tribal water system” means a tribal water system included by the state board in the drinking water needs assessment conducted and relied upon by the state board to inform its annual fund expenditure plan pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 116769 of the Health and Safety
 Code, as that assessment may be updated pursuant to Article 6 (commencing with Section 116772) of Chapter 4.6 of Part 12 of Division 104 of the Health and Safety Code.

(6) “Well” means a wellhead that provides drinking water to a water system.

(7) “Well project” means a project for the construction, maintenance, repair, or replacement of a well or a domestic well. 

(b) This division does not apply to a well project that meets all of the following conditions:

(1) The domestic well or water system to which the well is connected has been designated by the state board as high risk or medium risk in the state board’s drinking water needs assessment
 conducted and relied upon by the state board to inform its annual fund expenditure plan pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 116769 of the Health and Safety Code, as that assessment may be updated pursuant to Article 6 (commencing with Section 116772) of Chapter 4.6 of Part 12 of Division 104 of the Health and Safety Code. 

(2) The well project is designed to mitigate or prevent a failure of the well or the domestic well that would leave residents that rely on the well, the water system to which the well is connected, or the domestic well without an adequate supply of safe drinking water. 

(3) The lead agency determines all of the following:

(A) The well project is not designed primarily to serve irrigation or
 future growth.

(B) The well project does not affect wetlands or sensitive habitats.

(C) Unusual circumstances do not exist that would cause the well project to have a significant effect on the environment.

(D) The well project is not located on a site that is included on any list compiled pursuant to Section 65962.5 of the Government Code.

(E) The well project does not have the potential to cause a substantial adverse change in the significance of a historical resource.

(F) The well project’s construction impacts are fully mitigated consistent with applicable law.

(G) The cumulative impact of successive reasonably anticipated projects of the same type as the well project, in the same place, over time, is not significant.

(c) Before determining that a well project is exempt pursuant to this section, a lead agency shall contact the state board to determine whether claiming the exemption under this section will affect the ability of the well project to receive federal financial assistance or federally capitalized financial assistance. 

(d) (1) A lead agency that determines that a well project is exempt pursuant to this section shall file a notice of exemption, as described
 in Section 15062 of Title 14 of the California Code of Regulations, with the Office of Planning and Research in the manner specified in subdivisions (b) and (c) of Section 21108 and with the county clerk in the manner specified in subdivisions (b) and (c) of Section 21152.

(2) When a lead agency files a notice of exemption pursuant to paragraph (1), the lead agency shall also include the following information:

(A) Whether Section 21080 or 21080.47 of this code or Section 15301 or 15302 of Title 14 of the California Code of Regulations could apply to the well project.

(B) If Section 21080 or
 21080.47 of this code or Section 15301 or 15302 of Title 14 of the California Code of Regulations do not apply to the well project, the reason that the sections do not apply.

(e) This section shall remain in effect only until January 1, 2028, and as of that date is repealed.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 859, Sec. 1.   (AB 1642)   Effective January 1, 2023.   Repealed as of January 1, 2028, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

21080.32.

(a) This section shall only apply to publicly owned transit agencies, but shall not apply to any publicly owned transit agency created pursuant to Section 130050.2 of the Public Utilities Code.

(b) Except as provided in subdivision (c), and in accordance with subdivision (d), this division does not apply to actions taken on or after July 1, 1995, by a publicly owned transit agency to implement budget reductions caused by the failure of agency revenues to adequately fund agency programs and facilities.

(c) This section does not apply to any action to reduce or eliminate a transit service, facility, program, or activity that was approved or adopted as a mitigation measure in any environmental document authorized by this division or the National Environmental Policy Act (42 U.S.C. Sec. 4321 et seq.) or to any state or federal requirement that is imposed for the protection of the environment.

(d) (1) This section applies only to actions taken after the publicly owned transit agency has made a finding that there is a fiscal emergency caused by the failure of agency revenues to adequately fund agency programs and facilities, and after the publicly owned transit agency has held a public hearing to consider those actions. A publicly owned transit agency that has held such a hearing shall respond within 30 days at a regular public meeting to suggestions made by the public at the initial public hearing. Those actions shall be limited to projects defined in subdivision (a) or (b) of Section 21065 which initiate or increase fees, rates, or charges charged for any existing public service, program, or activity; or reduce or eliminate the availability of an existing publicly owned transit service, facility, program, or activity.

(2) For purposes of this subdivision, “fiscal emergency,” when applied to a publicly owned transit agency, means that the agency is projected to have negative working capital within one year from the date that the agency makes the finding that there is a fiscal emergency pursuant to this section. Working capital shall be determined by adding together all unrestricted cash, unrestricted short-term investments, and unrestricted short-term accounts receivable and then subtracting unrestricted accounts payable. Employee retirement funds, including Internal Revenue Code Section 457 deferred compensation plans and Section 401(k) plans, health insurance reserves, bond payment reserves, workers’ compensation reserves, and insurance reserves, shall not be factored into the formula for working capital.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 500, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

21080.33.

This division does not apply to any emergency project undertaken, carried out, or approved by a public agency to maintain, repair, or restore an existing highway, as defined in Section 360 of the Vehicle Code, except for a highway designated as an official state scenic highway pursuant to Section 262 of the Streets and Highways Code, within the existing right-of-way of the highway, damaged as a result of fire, flood, storm, earthquake, land subsidence, gradual earth movement, or landslide, within one year of the damage. This section does not exempt from this division any project undertaken, carried out, or approved by a public agency to expand or widen a highway damaged by fire, flood, storm, earthquake, land subsidence, gradual earth movement, or landslide.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 825, Sec. 6.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

21080.34.

For the purposes of Section 21069, the phrase “carrying out or approving a project” shall include the carrying out or approval of a plan for a project that expands or enlarges an existing publicly owned airport by any political subdivision, as described in Section 21661.6 of the Public Utilities Code.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 21080.35 (as added by Stats. 2001, Ch. 534, Sec. 1) by Stats. 2015, Ch. 303, Sec. 432.   (AB 731)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

21080.35.

(a) Except as provided in subdivision (d), this division does not apply to the installation of a solar energy system on the roof of an existing building or at an existing parking lot.

(b) For the purposes of this section, the following terms mean the following:

(1) “Existing parking lot” means an area designated and used for parking of vehicles as of the time of the application for the solar energy system and for at least the previous two years.

(2) “Solar energy system” includes all associated equipment. Associated equipment consists of parts and materials that enable the
 generation and use of solar electricity or solar-heated water, including any monitoring and control, safety, conversion, and emergency responder equipment necessary to connect to the customer’s electrical service or plumbing and any equipment, as well as any equipment necessary to connect the energy generated to the electrical grid, whether that connection is onsite or on an adjacent parcel of the building and separated only by an improved right-of-way. “Associated equipment” does not include a substation.

(c) (1) Associated equipment shall be located on the same parcel of the building, except that associated equipment necessary to connect the energy generated to the electrical grid may be located immediately adjacent to the parcel of the building or immediately adjacent to the parcel of the building and separated only by an improved right-of-way.

(2) Associated equipment shall not occupy more than 500 square feet of ground surface and the site of the associated equipment shall not contain plants protected by the Native Plant Protection Act (Chapter 10 (commencing with Section 1900) of Division 2 of the Fish and Game Code).

(d) This section does not apply if the associated equipment would otherwise require one of the following:

(1) An individual federal permit pursuant to Section 401 or 404 of the federal Clean Water Act (33 U.S.C. Sec. 1341 or 1344) or waste discharge requirements pursuant to the Porter-Cologne Water Quality Control Act (Division 7 (commencing with Section 13000) of the Water Code).

(2) An individual take permit for species protected under the federal Endangered Species Act of 1973 (16 U.S.C. Sec. 1531 et seq.) or the California
 Endangered Species Act (Chapter 1.5 (commencing with Section 2050) of Division 3 of the Fish and Game Code).

(3) A streambed alteration permit pursuant to Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 1600) of Division 2 of the Fish and Game Code.

(e) This section does not apply if the installation of a solar energy system at an existing parking lot involves either of the following:

(1) The removal of a tree required to be planted, maintained, or protected pursuant to local, state, or federal requirements, unless the tree dies and there is no requirement to replace the tree.

(2) The removal of a native tree over 25 years old.

(f) This section does not apply to any transmission or distribution
 facility or connection.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 469, Sec. 3.   (SB 226)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

21080.40.

(a) For purposes of this section, the following definitions apply:

(1) “Affordable housing project” means a project consisting of multifamily residential uses only or a mix of multifamily residential and nonresidential uses, with at least two-thirds of the square footage of the project designated for residential use, and that satisfies all of the following requirements:

(A) The project meets either of the following:

(i) All of the residential units within the project, excluding managers’ units, are dedicated to lower income households, as defined by
 Section 50079.5 of the Health and Safety Code.

(ii) The project complies with all of the requirements of Section 65914.7 of the Government Code.

(B) (i) The project meets the labor standards set forth in Section 65912.130 of the Government Code.

(ii) In addition to clause (i), for a project with 50 or more residential units, the project meets the labor standards set forth in Section 65912.131 of the Government Code.

(C) The project is located on a legal parcel or parcels in any of the following locations:

(i) In a city where the city boundaries include some portion of either an urbanized